Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-513
Violations; penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor for the first offense and of a Class II misdemeanor for any second or subsequent offense.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 171.